Massachusetts, session 194th, S114.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Title
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Family Protection and Transparency
Act."
SECTION 2: Definitions
Department: Refers to the Massachusetts Department of Children and Families (DCF).
Caseworker: Any employee or agent of the DCF conducting investigations or
assessments related to child maltreatment claims.
Parent or Guardian: The person legally responsible for a child under investigation by the
DCF.
of 4

Miranda Rights for Families: A set of procedural safeguards for parents and guardians
subject to DCF investigations.
SECTION 3: Rights of Families During DCF Investigations
Written Summary of Allegations
Upon first contact with a parent or guardian, the caseworker must provide the
guardian/parent a physical written summary of the allegations made against the parent or
guardian in a language the parent or guardian can read and/or understand. This document must
include:
A clear, concise description of the alleged mistreatment.
A statement of the parent or guardian’s rights, including the right to legal counsel, the
right to remain silent, and the right to refuse entry into their home without a court order.
Explanation of the Investigation Process
The caseworker must also explain the DCF's investigation process. This written
description must include:
The purpose of the investigation and the steps involved.
The legal authority and obligations of the DCF in conducting the investigation.
A timeline for the investigation, including potential outcomes (e.g., unfounded,
substantiated).
Information on how the family can seek legal assistance or advocacy services.
of 4

Recording of Interviews and Written Consent
All interviews conducted with the parents, guardians, or children must be recorded, with
the parent or guardian's written consent.
The caseworker must inform the parent or guardian that any information provided can be
used against them in court.
SECTION 4: Notice of Rights to the Parent or Guardian
Before conducting any interviews or investigations, the caseworker must read and
provide in writing the following rights to the parent or guardian:
The Right to Remain Silent:
Parents or guardians are not required to answer any questions posed by the DCF without
the presence of an attorney.
The Right to Refuse Entry to the Home Without a Court Order:
Caseworkers do not have the right to enter the home without a valid court order, unless
there is an immediate and imminent danger to the child.
The Right to Legal Representation:
Parents or guardians have the right to consult with an attorney at any point during the
investigation and may have legal representation during any interaction with the DCF.
The Right to Understand the Investigation Process:
of 4

The parent or guardian has the right to be fully informed of the DCF’s investigative
process and timelines.
The Right to Review Evidence:
The parent or guardian is entitled to request and review any non-confidential evidence
obtained during the investigation.
SECTION 5: Training and Implementation
Caseworker Training:
The DCF shall provide mandatory training to all caseworkers regarding the requirements
of this Act, including proper documentation of allegations, the delivery of Miranda Rights for
Families, and compliance with this Act’s procedural safeguards.
SECTION 6: Enforcement and Penalties
Penalties for Non-Compliance:
Any caseworker found in violation of this Act by failing to provide the required
information or infringing upon the rights of the parents or guardians as described in this Act will
face disciplinary action, including suspension or termination of employment, and possible civil
liability.
Civil Remedies:
Parents or guardians who are harmed by a violation of this Act have the right to pursue
civil remedies, including damages for emotional distress and legal costs.
of 4